Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1,133
Football players; compensation.

The Legislature further finds and declares that, in the same manner that nonathlete students are compensated for performing various tasks while a student, football players shall be entitled to fair financial compensation for playing football.

Laws 2003, LB 688, § 3.
For the operative date for this section, see section 85-1,136.